Utah statutes.
77-40-109.   Retention and release of expunged records -- Agencies.
(1)  The bureau shall keep, index, and maintain all expunged records of
arrests and convictions.
(2)  Employees of the bureau may not divulge any information contained in its
index to any person or agency without a court order unless specifically
authorized by statute.  The following organizations may receive information
contained in expunged records upon specific request:
(a)  the Board of Pardons and Parole;
(b)  Peace Officer Standards and Training;
(c)  federal authorities, unless prohibited by federal law;
(d)  the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing; and
(e)  the State Office of Education.
(3)  The bureau may also use the information in its index as provided in
Section 53-5-704.
(4)  If, after obtaining an expungement, the petitioner is charged with a
felony, the state may petition the court to open the expunged records upon a
showing of good cause.
(5) (a)  For judicial sentencing, a court may order any records expunged under
this chapter to be opened and admitted into evidence.
(b)  The records are confidential and are available for inspection only by the
court, parties, counsel for the parties, and any other person who is
authorized by the court to inspect them.
(c)  At the end of the action or proceeding, the court shall order the records
expunged again.
(d)  Any person authorized by this Subsection (5) to view expunged records may
not reveal or release any information obtained from the expunged records to
anyone outside the court.
(6)  Records released under this chapter are classified as protected under
Section 63G-2-305 and are accessible only as provided under Title 63G, Chapter
2, Part 2, Access to Records.
